Hawaii statutes.
[§676‑2] Required disclosures to
payee. Not less than three days prior to the date on which a payee signs a
transfer agreement, the transferee shall provide to the payee a separate
disclosure statement, in bold type no smaller than fourteen points, setting
forth:

(1) The amounts and due dates of the structured
settlement payments to be transferred;

(2) The aggregate amount of the payments in paragraph
(1);

(3) The discounted present value of the payments to
be transferred, which shall be identified as the "calculation of current
value of the transferred structured settlement payments under federal standards
for valuing annuities", and the amount of the applicable federal rate used
in calculating the discounted present value;

(4) The gross advance amount;

(5) An itemized listing of all applicable transfer
expenses, other than attorneys' fees and related disbursements payable in
connection with the transferee's application for approval of the transfer, and
the transferee's best estimate of the amount of any of the fees and
disbursements stated in this paragraph;

(6) The net advance amount;

(7) The amount of any penalties or liquidated damages
payable by the payee in the event of any breach of the transfer agreement by
the payee; and

(8) A statement that the payee has the right to
cancel the transfer agreement, without penalty or further obligation, not later
than the third business day after the date the agreement is signed by the
payee. [L 2006, c 146, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next